District of Columbia statutes.
42-815.04

Construction.

Other than a judicial review as permitted in § 42-815.02(e)(3) and the rights asserted in § 42-815.02(h-2) and (h-4), nothing in §§ 42-801 through 42-804 and §§ 42-811 through 42-819 shall be construed to create any new administrative, judicial, or other review not otherwise available under existing law and §§ 42-801 through 42-804 and §§ 42-811 through 42-819 shall not apply to actions for judicial foreclosure under § 42-816, or any other action for judicial foreclosure permitted under existing laws.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1274, ch. 854, § 539d
as added Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-40, § 2(d), 60 DCR 12304

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-40 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-40: Section 8 of D.C. Law 20-40 provided that §§ 2 and 3 of the act shall apply as of November 7, 2011.